Maryland, session 2026, SB0324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–205.1.
– 1 –

Ch. 613 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) In this section, “CCR standard” means the college and career readiness
standards established under this section.
(c) (2) A student shall meet the CCR standard when the student meets a
standard in English language arts, mathematics, and, when practicable, science that
enables the student to be successful in entry level credit bearing courses or postsecondary
education training at a State community college.
10–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(m) “Public senior higher education institution” means:
(1) The constituent institutions of the University System of Maryland and
the University of Maryland Center for Environmental Science;
(2) Morgan State University; and
(3) St. Mary’s College of Maryland.
15–101.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CCR STANDARD” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–205.1(A) OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “HIGH SCHOOL” MEANS A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE STATE THAT
OFFERS A PROGRAM OF INSTRUCTION FOR AT LEAST GRADES 11 AND 12, INCLUDING
A VIRTUAL SCHOOL ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 14 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 2028–2029 ACADEMIC YEAR,
THERE IS A DIRECT ADMISSION PROGRAM AT PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SENIOR
HIGHER EDUCATION INSTITUTIONS FOR ELIGIBLE HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS WHO
MEET THE CCR STANDARD ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–205.1 OF THIS ARTICLE
ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN THE MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING ENTERED INTO UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADMINISTER THE DIRECT ADMISSION
PROGRAM THROUGH THE COMMISSION’S FINANCIAL AID SYSTEM AND THE COMMON
APPLICATION.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 613
(C) (1) THE COMMISSION, THE DEPARTMENT, THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM
OF MARYLAND, MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY, AND ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF
MARYLAND SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR THE DIRECT
ADMISSION PROGRAM, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE, AT MINIMUM, COMPLETION OF THE
CCR STANDARD AND A MINIMUM HIGH SCHOOL GRADE POINT AVERAGE; AND
(II) ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING THAT
SPECIFIES THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR THE DIRECT ADMISSION
PROGRAM.
(2) A HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT IS ELIGIBLE FOR DIRECT ADMISSION TO
A PARTICIPATING PUBLIC SENIOR HIGHER EDUCATION INSTITUTION UNDER THIS
SECTION IF THE STUDENT:
(1) (I) HAS COMPLETED OR IS EXPECTED TO COMPLETE ALL OF
THE PREREQUISITE COURSES THAT ARE REQUIRED BY THE INSTITUTION TO WHICH
THE STUDENT APPLIES BY THE STUDENT’S ANTICIPATED MATRICULATION DATE;
(2) (II) HAS MET THE CCR STANDARD ESTABLISHED BY THE
DEPARTMENT MEETS THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN THE
MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING;
(3) (III) APPLIES FOR ADMISSION TO AN INSTITUTION:
(I) 1. BY THE REQUIRED APPLICATION DEADLINE
ESTABLISHED BY THE INSTITUTION; AND
(II) 2. DURING GRADE 12 OF HIGH SCHOOL;
(4) (IV) MEETS THE OTHER COURSE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED
BY THE INSTITUTION, IF ANY; AND
(5) (V) MEETS THE ADDITIONAL CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE
INSTITUTION, IF ANY.
(D) (1) A PUBLIC SENIOR HIGHER EDUCATION INSTITUTION MAY CHOOSE
TO PARTICIPATE IN THE DIRECT ADMISSION PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION.
– 3 –

Ch. 613 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) IF A PUBLIC SENIOR HIGHER EDUCATION INSTITUTION CHOOSES
TO PARTICIPATE IN THE DIRECT ADMISSION PROGRAM, THE PARTICIPATING
INSTITUTION SHALL:
(I) 1. AGREE TO USE THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS
SPECIFIED IN THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING;
2. DETERMINE ANY ADDITIONAL COURSES OR CRITERIA
NEEDED FOR A STUDENT TO QUALIFY FOR DIRECT ADMISSION TO THE INSTITUTION,
IF ANY; AND
2. 3. REPORT THE ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS UNDER
ITEM 1 2 OF THIS ITEM TO THE COMMISSION EACH YEAR;
(II) WAIVE THE APPLICATION FEE FOR STUDENTS WHO APPLY
FOR DIRECT ADMISSION TO THE INSTITUTION; AND
(III) OFFER CONDITIONAL DIRECT ADMISSION TO EACH HIGH
SCHOOL STUDENT WHO MEETS THE ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN THE MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING.
(3) A PARTICIPATING INSTITUTION MAY:
(I) VERIFY ANY INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE INSTITUTION
AND PROVIDED BY A HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT INDICATING ELIGIBILITY FOR DIRECT
ADMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(II) REVOKE A STUDENT’S OFFER OF DIRECT ADMISSION AT THE
INSTITUTION IF THE STUDENT:
1. IS NOT AWARDED A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA BEFORE
THE STUDENT’S ANTICIPATED MATRICULATION DATE;
2. HAS NOT MET THE CCR STANDARD ESTABLISHED BY
THE DEPARTMENT DOES NOT MEET THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN
THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING;
3. ENGAGES IN ACADEMIC MISCONDUCT; OR
4. AFTER THE STUDENT’S APPLICATION IS SUBMITTED,
EXPERIENCES SIGNIFICANTLY DECLINING GRADES THAT, UNDER THE
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 613
INSTITUTION’S STANDARD APPLICATION PROCESS, WOULD JUSTIFY THE
INSTITUTION REVOKING AN OFFER FOR ADMISSION.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COMMISSION JOINTLY SHALL ESTABLISH
A PROCESS FOR NOTIFYING THE COMMISSION OF EACH HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT IN
THE STATE WHO HAS MET THE CCR STANDARD ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS
SPECIFIED IN THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING EACH SCHOOL YEAR.
(F) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO OFFER
CONDITIONAL DIRECT ADMISSION FROM EACH PARTICIPATING INSTITUTION TO
EACH ELIGIBLE HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT BASED ON:
(I) THE CCR STANDARD DATA PROVIDED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA PROVIDED BY EACH
PARTICIPATING INSTITUTION.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL GENERATE A CUSTOMIZED LIST OF
PARTICIPATING INSTITUTIONS FOR EACH ELIGIBLE HIGH SCHOOL STUDENT THAT
INCLUDES THE SPECIFIC PARTICIPATING INSTITUTIONS FROM WHICH THE STUDENT
IS BEING OFFERED CONDITIONAL DIRECT ADMISSION IN THE COMMISSION’S
FINANCIAL AID SYSTEM AND THE COMMON APPLICATION.
(G) THE PROVISIONS IN THIS SECTION DO NOT GUARANTEE A HIGH SCHOOL
STUDENT ELIGIBLE FOR DIRECT ADMISSION PLACEMENT IN ANY SPECIFIC
PROGRAM OFFERED BY THE PARTICIPATING INSTITUTION OR TO ANY SPECIFIC
COLLEGE, SCHOOL, OR FUNCTIONAL EQUIVALENT WITHIN THE PARTICIPATING
INSTITUTION TO WHICH THE STUDENT APPLIES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Higher Education Commission, in collaboration with the State
Department of Education, shall study and make recommendations on the administration
of the direct admission program established under § 15–101.1 of the Education Article, as
enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Commission shall:
(1) identify the financial, technical, legal, and operational mechanisms
needed to effectively implement the direct admission program;
– 5 –

Ch. 613 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) evaluate whether a system could be developed to integrate student
academic data with financial aid eligibility data to provide simultaneous admission and
affordability notifications to students; and
(3) create an implementation timeline for the direct admission program.
(c) On or before July 1, 2027, the Commission shall submit a final report of its
findings and conclusions to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1 month
and, at the end of July 31, 2027, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by
the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 6 –